data/hyphy_genes.txt
ZNF224
ZNF225
ZNF226
ZNF227
ZNF229
ZNF23
ZNF230
ZNF232
ZNF233
ZNF234
ZNF235
ZNF236
ZNF239
ZNF24
ZNF248
ZNF25
ZNF250
ZNF251
ZNF253
ZNF254
ZNF256
ZNF257
ZNF26
ZNF260
ZNF263
ZNF264
ZNF266
ZNF267
ZNF268
ZNF273
ZNF274
ZNF275
ZNF276
ZNF277
ZNF28
ZNF280A
ZNF280B
ZNF280C
ZNF280D
ZNF281
ZNF282
ZNF283
ZNF284
ZNF285
ZNF286A
ZNF287
ZNF292
ZNF296
ZNF3
ZNF30
ZNF300
ZNF302
ZNF304
ZNF311
ZNF316
ZNF317
ZNF318
ZNF319
ZNF32
ZNF320
ZNF322
ZNF324
ZNF324B
ZNF326
ZNF329
ZNF330
ZNF331
ZNF333
ZNF334
ZNF335
ZNF337
ZNF33A
ZNF33B
ZNF34
ZNF341
ZNF343
ZNF345
ZNF346
ZNF347
ZNF35
ZNF350
ZNF354A
ZNF354B
ZNF354C
ZNF358
ZNF362
ZNF365
ZNF366
ZNF367
ZNF37A
ZNF382
ZNF383
ZNF384
ZNF385A
ZNF385B
ZNF385C
ZNF385D
ZNF391
ZNF394
ZNF395
ZNF396
ZNF397
ZNF398
ZNF404
ZNF407
ZNF408
ZNF41
ZNF410
ZNF414
ZNF415
ZNF416
ZNF417
ZNF418
ZNF419
ZNF420
ZNF423
ZNF425
ZNF426
ZNF428
ZNF429
ZNF43
ZNF430
ZNF431
ZNF432
ZNF433
ZNF436
ZNF438
ZNF439
ZNF44
ZNF440
ZNF441
ZNF442
ZNF443
ZNF444
ZNF445
ZNF446
ZNF449
ZNF45
ZNF451
ZNF454
ZNF460
ZNF461
ZNF462
ZNF467
ZNF468
ZNF469
ZNF470
ZNF471
ZNF473
ZNF474
ZNF479
ZNF48
ZNF480
ZNF483
ZNF484
ZNF485
ZNF486
ZNF487
ZNF488
ZNF490
ZNF491
ZNF492
ZNF493
ZNF496
ZNF497
ZNF500
ZNF501
ZNF502
ZNF503
ZNF506
ZNF507
ZNF510
ZNF511
ZNF511-PRAP1
ZNF512
ZNF512B
ZNF513
ZNF514
ZNF516
ZNF517
ZNF518A
ZNF518B
ZNF519
ZNF521
ZNF524
ZNF525
ZNF526
ZNF527
ZNF528
ZNF529
ZNF530
ZNF532
ZNF534
ZNF536
ZNF540
ZNF541
ZNF543
ZNF544
ZNF546
ZNF547
ZNF548
ZNF549
ZNF550
ZNF551
ZNF552
ZNF554
ZNF555
ZNF556
ZNF557
ZNF558
ZNF559
ZNF559-ZNF177
ZNF560
ZNF561
ZNF562
ZNF563
ZNF564
ZNF565
ZNF566
ZNF567
ZNF568
ZNF569
ZNF57
ZNF570
ZNF571
ZNF572
ZNF573
ZNF574
ZNF575
ZNF576
ZNF578
ZNF579
ZNF580
ZNF581
ZNF582
ZNF583
ZNF584
ZNF585A
ZNF585B
ZNF586
ZNF587
ZNF587B
ZNF589
ZNF592
ZNF593
ZNF594
ZNF595
ZNF596
ZNF597
ZNF598
ZNF599
ZNF600
ZNF605
ZNF606
ZNF607
ZNF608
ZNF609
ZNF610
ZNF611
ZNF613
ZNF614
ZNF615
ZNF616
ZNF618
ZNF619
ZNF620
ZNF621
ZNF622
ZNF623
ZNF624
ZNF625
ZNF625-ZNF20
ZNF626
ZNF627
ZNF628
ZNF629
ZNF630
ZNF638
ZNF639
ZNF641
ZNF644
ZNF646
ZNF648
ZNF649
ZNF652
ZNF653
ZNF654
ZNF655
ZNF658
ZNF66
ZNF660
ZNF662
ZNF664
ZNF665
ZNF667
ZNF668
ZNF669
ZNF670
ZNF670-ZNF695
ZNF671
ZNF672
ZNF674
ZNF675
ZNF676
ZNF677
ZNF678
ZNF679
ZNF680
ZNF681
ZNF682
ZNF683
ZNF684
ZNF687
ZNF688
ZNF689
ZNF69
ZNF691
ZNF692
ZNF695
ZNF696
ZNF697
ZNF699
ZNF7
ZNF70
ZNF700
ZNF701
ZNF703
ZNF704
ZNF705A
ZNF705B
ZNF705D
ZNF705E
ZNF705G
ZNF706
ZNF707
ZNF708
ZNF709
ZNF71
ZNF710
ZNF711
ZNF713
ZNF714
ZNF716
ZNF717
ZNF718
ZNF720
ZNF721
ZNF723
ZNF724
ZNF726
ZNF727
ZNF728
ZNF729
ZNF730
ZNF732
ZNF735
ZNF736
ZNF737
ZNF738
ZNF74
ZNF740
ZNF746
ZNF747
ZNF749
ZNF750
ZNF75A
ZNF75D
ZNF76
ZNF761
ZNF763
ZNF764
ZNF765
ZNF766
ZNF768
ZNF77
ZNF770
ZNF771
ZNF772
ZNF773
ZNF774
ZNF775
ZNF776
ZNF777
ZNF778
ZNF780A
ZNF780B
ZNF781
ZNF782
ZNF783
ZNF784
ZNF785
ZNF786
ZNF787
ZNF789
ZNF79
ZNF790
ZNF791
ZNF792
ZNF793
ZNF799
ZNF8
ZNF80
ZNF800
ZNF804A
ZNF804B
ZNF805
ZNF808
ZNF81
ZNF813
ZNF814
ZNF816
ZNF816-ZNF321P
ZNF821
ZNF823
ZNF827
ZNF829
ZNF83
ZNF830
ZNF831
ZNF835
ZNF836
ZNF837
ZNF839
ZNF84
ZNF841
ZNF843
ZNF844
ZNF845
ZNF846
ZNF85
ZNF850
ZNF852
ZNF853
ZNF860
ZNF862
ZNF865
ZNF875
ZNF878
ZNF879
ZNF880
ZNF883
ZNF888
ZNF891
ZNF90
ZNF91
ZNF92
ZNF93
ZNF98
ZNF99
ZNFX1
ZNHIT1
ZNHIT2
ZNHIT3
ZNHIT6
ZNRD1
ZNRD2
ZNRF1
ZNRF2
ZNRF3
ZNRF4
ZP1
ZP2
ZP3
ZP4
ZPBP
ZPBP2
ZPLD1
ZPR1
ZRANB1
ZRANB2
ZRANB3
ZRSR2
ZSCAN1
ZSCAN10
ZSCAN12
ZSCAN16
ZSCAN18
ZSCAN2
ZSCAN20
ZSCAN21
ZSCAN22
ZSCAN23
ZSCAN25
ZSCAN26
ZSCAN29
ZSCAN30
ZSCAN31
ZSCAN32
ZSCAN4
ZSCAN5A
ZSCAN5B
ZSCAN5C
ZSCAN9
ZSWIM1
ZSWIM2
ZSWIM3
ZSWIM4
ZSWIM5
ZSWIM6
ZSWIM7
ZSWIM8
ZSWIM9
ZUP1
ZW10
ZWILCH
ZWINT
ZXDA
ZXDB
ZXDC
ZYG11A
ZYG11B
ZYX
ZZEF1
